Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 2
— Powers of the Division and Commission

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public's perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State's regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 2, provided:

“‘Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology’ renamed to ‘Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality’.

“(a)

Effective March 31, 1999, the ‘Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology’ or ‘Department,’ as it is referred to or empowered throughout the Arkansas Code Annotated, is hereby renamed. In its place, the ‘Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality’ is hereby established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. The Director of the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology is directed to identify and revise all inter-agency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change by March 31, 1999.

“(b)

Nothing in this Act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authorities of the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology prior to the effective date of the name change.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 1230, § 4, provided: “The provisions of this act shall be in addition and supplemental to all other laws of Arkansas and rules, regulations or policies adopted by the Arkansas Commission on Pollution Control and Ecology now in effect and shall repeal only such laws or parts of laws as may be specifically in conflict with this act.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 1264, § 6: Apr. 20, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that consideration of economic impact and environmental benefit should be immediately implemented by the Commission and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the environment and the welfare of the state shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 44: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-1-201. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly recognizes that since 1949, when the precursor of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission was first created, significant changes have occurred in the responsibilities charged to the state's environmental agency. This subchapter intends to clarify and supersede prior law that does not comport with this delineation of responsibility between the Division of Environmental Quality and the commission.

Further, in delineating the responsibility between the division and the commission, it is the intent of the General Assembly neither to expand nor to diminish any rights of property owners of this state under Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 22.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1230, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 5; 1993, No. 165, § 5; 1997, No. 1219, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2430.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-1-202. Powers of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall be the executive officer and active administrator of all pollution control activities in the state.

As such, the director's duties shall include:

The administration of permitting, licensing, certification, and grants programs deemed necessary to protect the environmental integrity of the state.

The director, or his or her delegatee within his or her staff, shall serve as the issuing authority for the state;

Initiation and settlement of civil or administrative enforcement actions to compel compliance with laws, orders, rules, and federal regulations charged to the responsibility of the Division of Environmental Quality.

In this regard, the director may propose the assessment of civil penalties as provided by law and take all actions necessary to collect such penalties;

Issuance of orders in such circumstances that reasonably require emergency measures to be taken to protect the environment or the public health and safety, except to the extent that the matter involved is reserved to the jurisdiction or orders of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for rulemaking procedures in § 8-4-202;

Day-to-day administration of all activities that the Division of Environmental Quality is empowered by law to perform, including, but not limited to, the employment and supervision of such technical, legal, and administrative staff, within approved appropriations and with the approval of the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, as is necessary to carry out the responsibilities vested with the Division of Environmental Quality;

Providing technical and legal expertise and assistance in the field of environmental protection to other agencies and subdivisions of the state as appropriate;

Day-to-day administration of environmental programs delegated to the State of Arkansas by the responsible agencies of the United States Government;

The supervision of the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality under the Arkansas Energy Reorganization and Policy Act of 1981, § 15-10-201 et seq.;

Any other power or duty specifically vested with the director or the Division of Environmental Quality by the General Assembly or the secretary; and

The supervision of the Division of Environmental Preservation or the successor division, office, or unit responsible for reviewing and making specific ecologically oriented recommendations on all plans, programs, and projects of all other state departments, divisions, agencies, and commissions and on all federal plans, programs, and projects affecting this state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1230, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 6; 1993, No. 165, § 6; 1999, No. 1164, § 8; 2017, No. 271, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 436; 2019, No. 910, § 2431.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “United States Government” for “federal government” in (b)(2)(F); inserted present (b)(2)(G); and redesignated former (b)(2)(G) as (b)(2)(H).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules” and “federal” in (b)(2)(B)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the section heading; deleted (a); and rewrote the remaining provisions.

8-1-203. Powers and responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall meet regularly in publicly noticed open meetings to discuss and rule upon matters of environmental concern.

The commission's powers and duties shall be as follows:

Promulgation of rules implementing the substantive statutes charged to the Division of Environmental Quality for administration.

In promulgation of such rules, prior to the submittal to public comment and review of any rule or change to any rule that is more stringent than the federal requirements, the commission shall duly consider the economic impact and the environmental benefit of such rule on the people of the State of Arkansas, including those entities that will be subject to the rule.

The commission shall promptly initiate rulemaking proceedings to further implement the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

The extent of the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section shall be defined in the commission's rulemaking required under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section. It will include a written report which shall be available for public review along with the proposed rule in the public comment period.

Upon completion of the public comment period, the commission shall compile a rulemaking record or response to comments demonstrating a reasoned evaluation of the relative impact and benefits of the more stringent rule;

Promulgation of rules and procedures not otherwise governed by applicable law that the commission deems necessary to secure public participation in environmental decision-making processes;

Promulgation of rules governing administrative procedures for challenging or contesting division actions;

In the case of permitting or grants decisions, providing the right to appeal a permitting or grants decision rendered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her delegatee;

In the case of an administrative enforcement or emergency action, providing the right to contest any such action initiated by the director;

Instruct the director to prepare such reports or perform such studies as will advance the cause of environmental protection in the state;

Make recommendations to the director regarding overall policy and administration of the division. However, the director shall always remain within the plenary authority of the Governor; and

Upon a majority vote, initiate review of any director's decision.

In providing for adjudicatory review as contemplated by subdivisions (b)(4) and (5) of this section, the commission may appoint one (1) or more administrative law judges.

An administrative law judge shall at all times serve as an agent of the commission.

In hearings upon appeals of permitting or grants decisions by the director or contested administrative enforcement or emergency actions initiated by the director, the administrative law judge shall administer the hearing in accordance with procedures adopted by the commission and, after due deliberation, submit his or her recommended decision to the commission.

Commission review of any appealed or contested matter shall be upon the record compiled by the administrative law judge and his or her recommended decision.

Commission review shall be de novo. However, no additional evidence need be received unless the commission so decides in accordance with established administrative procedures.

The commission may afford the opportunity for oral argument to all parties of the adjudicatory hearing.

By the majority vote of a quorum, the commission may affirm, reverse and dismiss, or reverse and remand to the director.

If the commission votes to affirm or reverse, such decision shall constitute final agency action for purposes of appeal.

Any party aggrieved by the commission decision may appeal as provided by applicable law.

The Chair of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may appoint one (1) or more committees composed of commission members to act in an advisory capacity to the full commission.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1230, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 7; 1993, No. 165, § 7; 1993, No. 1264, § 2; 1995, No. 117, § 1; 2015, No. 838, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 437-439; 2019, No. 910, §§
2432-2434.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1264, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly desires to provide protection of the human health and the environment for the citizens of the state. In providing for such protection, the General Assembly recognizes that environmental rules and regulations should have a sound scientific and economic basis. Thus, the General Assembly finds that, prior to the promulgation of any environmental rule or regulation by the state that is more stringent than federal requirements, the state must consider the economic impact and environmental benefit such rule or regulation will have on the citizens of the state of Arkansas prior to such promulgation.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designations (c)(1)(A) and (c)(1)(B); substituted “law judges” for “hearing officers” in (c)(1)(A); in (c)(1)(B), substituted “An administrative law judge” for “The administrative hearing officers” and “an agent” for “agents”; and substituted “law judge” for “hearing officer” in (c)(2) and (c)(3)(A)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” and made similar changes throughout the section; and
substituted “rule” for “regulation” at the end of (b)(1)(B) and (b)(1)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1)(A) and (b)(4); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(7).

8-1-204. Administrative law judge.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall employ a full-time administrative law judge to perform functions and duties that the commission shall direct and, in particular, to advise the commission on matters of law and procedure that may arise during the conduct of commission duties and responsibilities as outlined in §§ 8-1-203, 8-4-201, 8-4-202, 8-4-311, 8-5-205, and 8-6-207, or as otherwise provided by law.

The administrative law judge shall be selected and hired by the commission and shall be independent of and not an employee of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The expenses of the administrative law judge shall be paid from the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund or from other sources as provided by law.

The office space for the administrative law judge shall be at a location other than the offices of the division.

An administrative assistant II shall be supervised by and provide assistance to the administrative law judge authorized in this section.

The disbursing officer of the division shall disburse the funds appropriated for the commission's administrative law judge.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 36; 1999, No. 1164, § 9; 2003, No. 51, § 1; 2015, No. 838, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2435.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “law judge” for “hearing officer” in the section heading and throughout the section; and substituted “administrative law judge” for “hearing officer” in (d) and (f).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d) and (f).

Cross References.

Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, §§ 8-1-105 and 19-5-1137.

8-1-205. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Mercury Task Force recommendations and implementation was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1153, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 35; 1999, No. 1164, § 10.

8-1-206. Voluntary environmental stewardship program — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Environmental laws” means this title and any rules, permits, and orders adopted or issued under this title;

“Environmental management system” means a set of documented processes and practices that enable an organization to reduce its environmental impact and increase operating efficiency by continuously improving its environmental performance;

“Environmental performance” means the effect of a facility or activity on air, water, land, natural resources, or human health and the generation of waste by a facility or activity; and

“Organization” means a company, corporation, political subdivision, firm, enterprise, or institution, or any part or combination, whether incorporated or not, public or private, that has its own functions and administration.

For an organization with more than one (1) operating unit, a single operating unit may be treated as an organization.

“Organization” includes persons or entities regulated by the Division of Environmental Quality and those not regulated by the division.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may develop, implement, and administer a voluntary environmental stewardship program.

The voluntary environmental stewardship program shall provide recognition for those organizations that have a history of sustained compliance with environmental law requirements or organizations that go above and beyond environmental law requirements.

At the discretion of the director, the voluntary environmental stewardship program shall provide incentives for organizations that demonstrate sustained compliance with environmental laws or go above and beyond environmental law requirements to include without limitation:

Reduced inspection frequency;

Reduced reporting requirements; or

Advanced notification of inspections and enforcement rulings.

The voluntary environmental stewardship program shall include tiers commensurate with and appropriate to the environmental impacts of an organization's facilities, activities, products, or services, and be based on an organization's level of commitment to the voluntary environmental stewardship program.

Participation in the voluntary environmental stewardship program by any organization is voluntary.

The division shall approve an organization's membership in the voluntary environmental stewardship program and shall review the organization's membership at least one (1) time every three (3) years.

Membership and tier level assignment shall be based on the organization's commitment to:

Sustained compliance with environmental laws and history of compliance with environmental laws;

Develop, implement, and maintain an environmental management system;

Going above and beyond the requirements of environmental laws;

Pollution prevention and improving its environmental performance; and

Reporting to the division on its environmental performance annually.

Membership in the voluntary environmental stewardship program is not a license or permit under this title.

The denial or approval of membership is not an appealable action or an action against the organization under this title.

This section does not permit the violation of state or federal laws.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 858, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 440.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1).

Subchapter 3
— Environmental Audit Reports

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 871, § 11: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that immediate implementation of these statutes is necessary in order to ensure that the state meets immediate Environmental Protection Agency requirements for authorization and delegation of federal programs to the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-1-301. Purpose.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that protection of the environment is enhanced by the public's voluntary compliance with environmental laws and that the public will benefit from incentives to identify and remedy environmental compliance issues. It is further declared that limited expansion of the protection against disclosure will encourage such voluntary compliance and improve environmental quality and that the voluntary provisions of this subchapter will not inhibit the exercise of the regulatory authority by those entrusted with protecting our environment.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1.

8-1-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“Environmental audit” means a voluntary, internal, and comprehensive evaluation of one (1) or more facilities or an activity at one (1) or more facilities regulated under this chapter, or federal, regional, or local counterparts or extensions thereof, or of management systems related to that facility or activity, that is designed to identify and prevent noncompliance and to improve compliance with statutory or regulatory requirements.

An environmental audit may be conducted by the owner or operator, by the owner's or operator's employees, or by independent contractors; and

“Environmental audit report” means a set of documents prepared as a result of an environmental audit, and labeled “ENVIRONMENTAL AUDIT REPORT: PRIVILEGED DOCUMENT”, that may include:

Field notes, records of observations, findings, opinions, suggestions, conclusions, drafts, memoranda, drawings, photographs, computer-generated or electronically recorded information, maps, charts, graphs, and surveys collected or developed for the primary purpose of preparing an environmental audit;

An audit report prepared by the auditor that includes:

The scope of the audit;

The information gained in the audit;

Conclusions and recommendations; and

Exhibits and appendices;

Memoranda and documents analyzing a portion of or all of the audit report and discussing implementation issues; and

An implementation plan that addresses correcting past compliance, improving current compliance, and preventing future noncompliance.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 2436.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2).

8-1-303. Privilege.

In order to encourage owners and operators of facilities and persons conducting other activities regulated under this chapter or its federal counterparts or extensions, both to conduct voluntary internal environmental audits of their compliance programs and management systems and to assess and improve compliance with statutory and regulatory requirements, an environmental audit privilege is created to protect the confidentiality of communications relating to voluntary internal environmental audits.

An environmental audit report shall be privileged and shall not be admissible as evidence in any civil or administrative legal action, including enforcement actions.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 1.

8-1-304. Waiver.

The privilege described in § 8-1-303 does not apply to the extent that:

It is waived expressly by the owner or operator of the facility that prepared or caused to be prepared the environmental audit report;

The owner or operator of a facility or person conducting an activity seeks to introduce an environmental audit report as evidence; and

The owner or operator of a facility authorizes the disclosure of the environmental audit report to any party, except when:

Disclosure is made under the terms of a confidentiality agreement between the owner or operator of a facility and:

A potential purchaser of the facility; or

A customer, lending institution, or insurance company with an existing or proposed relationship with the facility;

Disclosure is made under the terms of a confidentiality agreement between government officials and the owner or operator of a facility; or

Disclosure is made to an independent contractor retained by the owner or operator of the facility for the purpose of identifying noncompliance with statutory or regulatory requirements and assisting the owner or operator in achieving compliance with reasonable diligence.

The waiver of the privilege described in § 8-1-303 may be for part or all of the environmental audit report, and the waiver of privilege extends only to that part of the environmental audit report expressly waived by the owner or operator of a facility.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1.

8-1-305. Exceptions.

The privilege described in § 8-1-303 does not apply to the following:

Documents, communications, data, reports, or other information that must be collected, developed, maintained, reported, or otherwise made available to the public or a regulatory agency under:

Federal or state law or extensions thereof;

A rule or standard adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

A determination, a permit, or an order made or issued by the commission or the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality; or

Any other federal, state, or local law, permit, or order;

Information obtained by observation, sampling, or monitoring by any regulatory agency; and

Information obtained from a source independent of the environmental audit.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2437.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1)(C).

8-1-306. Stipulation.

The parties to a legal action may at any time stipulate to the entry of an order that directs that specific information contained in an environmental audit report is or is not subject to the privilege provided under § 8-1-303.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1.

8-1-307. Disclosure in civil or administrative proceeding.

In a civil or administrative proceeding, a court of record or administrative tribunal, after an in-camera review, shall require disclosure of material for which the privilege described in § 8-1-303 is asserted if the court or administrative tribunal determines one (1) of the following:

The privilege is asserted for a fraudulent purpose;

The material is not subject to the privilege;

The material is subject to the privilege and the material shows evidence of noncompliance with:

Federal or state law or extensions of such statutes;

Any rule adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission; or

A determination, permit, or order issued by the commission or the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality; and

The person claiming the privilege did not promptly initiate and pursue appropriate efforts to achieve compliance with reasonable diligence.

If the noncompliance described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section constitutes a failure to obtain a required permit, the person is deemed to have made appropriate efforts to achieve compliance if the person filed an application for the required permit not later than ninety (90) days after the date the person became aware of the noncompliance.

In the event additional time is required to prepare a permit application, the person shall, within ninety (90) days, submit a schedule to the Division of Environmental Quality that identifies the activities required to complete the application, and, if the schedule is acceptable to the division, the filing of the application pursuant to the submitted schedule shall constitute reasonable diligence to achieve compliance for a failure to obtain a required permit.

Nothing in this section authorizes a facility to operate without the proper permit having been issued.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 12; 2019, No. 315, § 441; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2438, 2439.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3)(C) and (b)(2)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(A).

8-1-308. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §§ 1-2-207 and 1-2-303, the repeal of this section by Acts 1999, No. 871, § 4 is deemed to supersede its amendment by Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 13.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning disclosure in a criminal proceeding, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 871, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 13.

8-1-309. Audit privilege reserved for administrative or civil proceedings.

The privilege created by § 8-1-303 does not apply to criminal investigations or proceedings. When an environmental audit report is obtained, reviewed, or used in a criminal proceeding, the privilege created by § 8-1-303 applicable to administrative or civil proceedings is not waived or eliminated.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 5.

8-1-310. Burden of proof.

A party asserting the environmental audit privilege under § 8-1-303 has the burden of proving the privilege, including if there is evidence of noncompliance with federal or state law or extensions thereof, and proof that appropriate efforts to achieve compliance were promptly initiated and pursued with reasonable diligence.

A party seeking disclosure under § 8-1-307 has the burden of proving the privilege is asserted for a fraudulent purpose.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 6.

8-1-311. Partial disclosure.

Upon making a determination under § 8-1-307, the court of record or administrative tribunal may compel disclosure of only those parts of an environmental audit report that are relevant to issues in dispute in the proceeding.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1; 1999, No. 871, § 7.

8-1-312. Scope.

Nothing in this subchapter may limit, waive, or abrogate:

The scope of any statutory or common law privilege, including the work product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege; or

The rights of the public as provided in the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 350, § 1;
2009, No. 1199, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment redesignated the section, and made related and
minor stylistic changes.